Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2452
Power project agency; provisions applicable.

Any agency created pursuant to sections 18-2426 to 18-2434 shall be considered to be a governmental subdivision within the meaning of section 70-625.02 and shall be considered to be a generating power agency within the meaning of sections 70-626.01 to 70-626.05.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 52.